Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Nonpayment of Real Estate Tax

6-55-201. Sale of real estate for delinquency.

If taxes assessed upon real estate in the corporation, according to its ordinances, are not paid by the owner of the property within the year for which they were assessed, the collector shall report the facts to the recorder or other officer, and the recorder or other officer shall cause the real estate to be sold in the manner prescribed for sale of real estate for state and county taxes.

The sheriff or county trustee shall pay the money received on such sales to the treasurer of the corporation, and, if the sheriff or county trustee fails to do so, the sheriff or county trustee shall be liable to judgment on motion.

Code 1858, §§ 1380, 1381 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 17, § 12); Shan., §§ 1970, 1971; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3377, 3378; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-703; Acts 1993, ch. 81, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 93, 94.

6-55-202. Tax suit — Jurisdiction.

It is lawful for any incorporated municipality to sue in the chancery court of the county in which it is located for taxes due the municipality upon real estate, whenever the taxes are past due and unpaid. The fact that the complaint contains the names of more than one (1) defendant shall not subject the complaint to an objection for misjoinder by reason of the distinct interests the several defendants have in the properties proceeded against.

Acts 1897, ch. 6, § 1; Shan., § 1972a1; mod. Code 1932, § 3380; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-704; Acts 2013, ch. 353, § 8.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 93.

6-55-203. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 6-55-203 [Acts 1897, ch. 6, § 3; Shan., § 1972a3; Mod. Code 1932, § 3382; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-705] concerning prerequisites to a tax suit, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 81, § 2, effective March 25, 1993.

6-55-204. Tax suit — Prejudgment payment of taxes.

Should any person interested pay, after the bill is filed, and before sale of the land, to the attorney representing the municipality, or such other person as may be designated by the municipality to receive it, the amount of taxes sued for, and interest thereon, it shall be the duty of the attorney aforementioned to dismiss the suit as to the persons and property included in the payment; provided, that the person so paying the taxes shall pay such person's just proportion of the costs accrued in the cause to the date of payment.

Acts 1897, ch. 6, § 2; Shan., § 1972a2; mod. Code 1932, § 3381; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-706.

6-55-205. Tax suit — Enforcement of judgment.

The court may proceed to judgment or decree against all defendants who do not settle the taxes due as provided above, and enforce the judgment or decree and the lien for the taxes due by sale of the lands upon which such taxes are assessed, under the rules applicable to other chancery sales.

Acts 1897, ch. 6, § 4; Shan., § 1972a4; Code 1932, § 3383; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-707.

6-55-206. Tax suit — Fees.

The same fees for clerks and other officers as are allowed by law, providing for collection of delinquent state and county taxes, shall be allowed the clerk and other officers acting under §§ 6-55-202 — 6-55-205.

Acts 1897, ch. 6, § 5; Shan., § 1972a5; Code 1932, § 3384; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-708.